Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB183.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 306(c)(22) of the act of June 2, 1915 (P.L.736, No.338), known as the Workers' Compensation Act, is amended to read:Section 306. The following schedule of compensation is hereby established:* * *(c) For all disability resulting from permanent injuries of the following classes, the compensation shall be exclusively as follows:123456789101112131415161718 * * *(22) For serious and permanent disfigurement of [the head, neck or face] the body, of such a character as to produce an unsightly appearance, and such as is not usually incident to the employment, sixty-six and two-thirds per centum of wages not to exceed [two hundred seventy-five weeks.] four hundred weeks. Disfigurement benefits paid to the injured worker shall be made separate and apart from total or partial disability. A claimant is not precluded from collecting both total or partial disability benefits and a disfigurement benefit simultaneously.* * *Section 2. The amendment of section 306(c)(22) of the act shall apply to injuries sustained on or after the effective date of this section. PERMANENTLY DISFIGURING INJURIES FOR WHICH PERMANENT DISFIGUREMENT IS REACHED ON OR AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION, REGARDLESS OF WHEN THE ORIGINAL INJURY OCCURRED.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0183PN0506 - 2 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718